Massachusetts, session 194th, H2319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 129 of the general laws is hereby amended in section 27 by adding
at the end thereof the following new paragraph:
Each entity that is not otherwise required to be licensed under M.G.L. c. 129, §§ 39, 39A,
or 45, or under M.G.L. c. 94, § 152A, and whose primary activity is the placement of abandoned,
displaced, unwanted, neglected or abused animals and is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3)
of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or equivalent nonprofit designation under such Code, shall
report to the director on an annual basis the number of dogs and cats brought into the state during
the prior year by such entity and the state or country of origin for each such animal including, but
not limited to identification of the origination source and transporter. Such report shall be on a
form as prescribed by the director.
of 1